tasks/task4/script.foma
# script.foma
# Leonel Figueiredo de Alencar leonel.de.alencar@ufc.br
# August 24, 2022

clear
set flag-is-epsilon ON
read lexc verbs.lexc
define Lexicon

# thematic vowels
define VT [ a | e | i ] ;

# 1st plural suffix
define PL1 {mos} ;

# 2nd plural suffix
define PL2 {is} ;

# ends with some morpheme followed by the 1st or 2nd plural suffix
define PL12 $ "^" ?+ "^" [ PL1 | PL2 ] .#. ;

# indicative imperfect
define IMPF "^" {va} "^" ;

# pluperfect
define PQP "^" {ra} "^" ;

# E Replacement: "e" of future indicative suffix "-re" changes to "á" before "s" or at word end (compr^a^^re^ => compr^a^^rá^)
define EReplacement e -> á || "^" r _ "^" [s | .#.] ;

# Nasalisation: "e" of future indicative suffixe changes to "ã" before word-final "m" (compr^a^^re^m => compr^a^^rã^m)
define Nasalisation e -> ã || "^" r _  "^" m .#.;

# M Replacement: "m" of 3rd person plural suffix changes to "o" before future indicative suffixe "rã" (compr^a^^rã^m => compr^a^^rã^o)
define MReplacement m -> o || ã "^" _ ;

# E Raising: thematic vowel "e" changes to "i" before imperfect indicative suffix "va" (vend^e^va^m => vend^i^va^m)
define ERaising e -> i || _ "^" {va} "^" ;

# V Deletion: "v" of imperfect indicative suffix "va" is deleted when the verb belongs to the 2nd or 3rd conjugation (vend^i^va^m => vend^i^a^m)
define VDeletion v -> 0 || i "^" _ [ a | e ] "^" ;

# Thematic Vowel I Accentuation: "i" receives acute accent if word ends with 1fst or 2nd plural suffixes (vend^i^a^mos => vend^í^a^mos)
define TVIAccentuation i -> í || _ PL12 ;

# Conditional (Suffix) Accentuation: "i" of COND suffix "ria" receives acute accent if followed by 1fst or 2nd plural suffix
define CondAccentuation i -> í || r _ ?+ %^ [ PL1 | PL2 ] ;

# A Accentuation: thematic vowel "a" receives acute accent before "va" and 1fst or 2nd plural suffixes (compr^a^va^mos => compr^á^va^mos)
define AAccentuation a -> á || _ IMPF [ PL1 | PL2 ] .#. ;

# A Raising: "a" changes to "e" before 2nd plural suffix (compr^a^ria^is => compr^a^rie^is, vend^e^va^is => vend^e^ve^is)
define ARaising a -> e || "^" ?+ "^" ?+ _ "^" PL2 .#. ;

# present subjunctive suffixes
define SBJR "^" [ e | a ] "^" ;

# first singular suffix "o"
define O1SG "^" "^" o .#. ;

# Thematic Vowel Deletion: thematic vowel is deleted before 1st singular suffix "o" (compr^a^^o => compr^^^o, compr^a^e^ => compr^^e^)
define TVDeletion VT -> 0 || _ [ O1SG | SBJR ] ;

# "^" Cleanup: deletion of morphem boundary symbol
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Grammar  Lexicon  .o.
                TVDeletion .o.
                EReplacement .o.
                Nasalisation .o.
                MReplacement .o.
                AAccentuation .o.
                ERaising .o.
                ARaising .o.
                VDeletion .o.
                TVIAccentuation .o.
                CondAccentuation .o.
                Cleanup ;

regex Grammar ;
ss verbs.fst
